 Now we have four-month-old mice that no longer have diabetes.
 According to Dr Ehud Ur, professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and chair of the Canadian diabetes Association's Clinical-Scientific Advisory Committee, the research is still in its early stages.
 Like some other experts, he doubts that diabetes can be cured, noting that these discoveries do not relate to people who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sarah Daniells, permanent Secretary of the Nobel Committee for Literature at the Swedish Academy, publicly stated on Sveriges radio that the committee, which had failed to contact Bob Dylan directly and inform him that he had won the Nobel Prize in Literature for 2016, was giving up attempts to contact him.
 Danius said, I called and sent Emails to his closest collaborator and received very friendly replies. At this point, of course, this is enough.
 Earlier, Ring's general director, Jamie Siminoff, noted that this company began with him not hearing a doorbell at his garage's workshop.
 He said he created a doorbell that works off WiFi.
 Siminoff said that sales grew after his appearance on the show's Shark Tank in 2013, where members of the jury refused to fund his startup.
 In late 2017, Siminoff appeared on the shopping channel QVC.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with a competitor, the security firm ADT Corporation.
 Despite the fact that a vaccine was found capable of reducing the mortality rate from Ebola virus, no drug has yet demonstrated a clear effect in treating the existing infection.
 The ZMapp cocktail initially showed promising results in this area, but official studies have shown that it has less benefit in preventing death than was previously expected.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control level, meaning scientists used it as a baseline and compared it to three other treatments.
 The USA gymnastics Federation supports the letter from the USA Olympic Committee and agrees with the absolute necessity of creating a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC statement that it is in the best interest of our athletes, clubs, and their sports to reform from within our organization, rather than to annul its certification.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could shed light on how, in such a scale, so bravely described by survivors, Larry Nassar could have gone unchecked for so long, and supports all necessary and appropriate changes in this case.
 The U S . gymnastics Federation and the U S . Olympic Committee have the same goal to make gymnastics and other sports as safe for athletes as possible so they can strive for their goals in a safe, positive environment and be empowered with all rights.
 In the 1960s, Brzezinski served as a counselor to John F . Kennedy, then in the administration of Lyndon B . Johnson.
 During the 1976 election, he consulted Carter on foreign policy, then from 1977 to 1981, he worked as a national security advisor, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 As a national security advisor, he helped Carter in world diplomacy, for example, in the conclusion of the Camp David accords in the late 1970s, in the development of policy in relation to the Iranian revolution, which led to the hostage crisis in 1979, and in the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 This film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, received nominations in all the major categories.
 Gosling and stone received nominations for best actor and actress respectively.
 Among other nominations are best picture, director, cinematography, costume design, film editing, original music, production design, sound editing, sound and original screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition and City of Stars, were nominated for best original song, and Lionsgate was nominated for best original song.
 Late on Sunday, U S . President Donald Trump, through a press Secretary, said U S . troops would leave Syria.
 The statement came after Trump had a phone call with President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan of Turkey.
 Turkey will also play a major role in protecting captured Isis fighters, whom European states have said they do not want to return home.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, which is already a widely accepted theory, but also provides details that usually cannot be obtained from fossil remains, such as color and three-dimensional structure.
 Scientists say that the feathers of this animal were a chestnut-brown color above, and below, either bluish or had carotenoid pigmentation.
 The find also allows us to see the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Since dinosaur feathers lack a well-developed rachis, but still have other distinctive features—the beard and the beard-like fringes,
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but rather for regulating temperature and demonstrating.
 Researchers have suggested that, despite the fact that this is the tail of a young dinosaur, this specimen has the plumage of an adult, not the down of a chick.
 Yesterday morning, a car bomb exploded near the main police headquarters in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two police officers and injuring more than 20 others.
 The governor's office said that 19 of the wounded were police officers.
 Police said the attack was suspected to be carried out by a suspected Daesh (ISIS) bomber.
 They discovered that the sun worked on the same basic principles as other stars: it was established that the activity of all stars in the system was determined by their brightness, rotation and nothing else.
 The combined brightness and rotation is used to determine the number of Rossby stars associated with a plasma flow.
 The fewer Rossby numbers, the less active a star is in relation to the inversions of the magnetic field.
 Iwasaki often found himself in unpleasant situations while travelling.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a mad dog in Tibet, avoided a wedding in Nepal and was arrested in India.
 Standard 802.11n works on both frequencies, 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz.
 This will ensure its backward compatibility with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, provided the base station has a dual receiver.
 Speeds of 802.11n are significantly faster than its predecessors with a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duval, who is married and has two teenage children, did not make a big impression on Miller, who was told the story.
 When Miller was asked for a comment, he said, Mike talks a lot during hearings . I prepared, so I didn't really listen to what he was saying.
 We will be making efforts to significantly reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by 2020 compared to the level in 2005.
 He did not name a figure for budget cuts, saying that they would be made based on the productivity of China's economy.
 Hu urged developing countries to avoid the old scheme in which first they pollute and then clean up.
 He added that they should not be asked to take on commitments that go beyond their stage of development, responsibilities and capabilities.
 Today at 12:00 GMT, the Iraq Study Group presented its report.
 He warns, no one can guarantee that any plan of action in Iraq in the current situation can stop the religious war, growing violence or looming chaos.
 The report opens with a call for open debate and consensus-building in the United States about Middle East policy.
 The report contains a scathing critique of almost every aspect of the current policy of the executive branch in Iraq and a urgent call for an immediate change of course.
 First among 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be implemented by the end of this year to strengthen Iraq's borders so as to prevent hostile interference, and to re-establish diplomatic relations with neighbours.
 Argentina's current Senator and first lady, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced her candidacy for President yesterday evening in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers (31 miles) from Buenos Aires.
 Mrs . Kirchner announced her intention to run for President in the Argentine theater, in the same place where she began her Senate campaign in 2005 as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 The reason for the debate was disagreement over the cost of providing material support and rebuilding buildings after Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives jokingly called the Bush-New Orleans deal.
 Liberal criticism of the efforts to rebuild focused on the fact that contracts for rebuilding work were allegedly given to companies with ties to the government.
 More than four million people traveled to Rome to attend the funeral.
 The number of people present was so great that not all could fit on St . Peter's square, where the funeral was held.
 In various places throughout Rome, large television screens were set up, with which people could watch the ceremony.
 Similar plazas that have been visited by large numbers of people have been organized in many other cities in Italy and in the rest of the world, in particular in Poland.
 Historians criticize the FBI's past policies for devoting most of its resources to cases that were easily solved, especially car theft cases, in order to raise the agency's success rate.
 Congress began funding the initiative to combat pornography in 2005 tax year and determined that the FBI should allocate 10 agents to combat adult pornography.
 Angel explained the Continuum approach as a method being used to help organizations reach a higher level of performance.
 The middle order batsmen Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid performed well and earned a result in tandem of one hundred runs.
 However, after losing the calf, captain India made only 36 runs, losing 7 calf toes to complete the innings.
 President George W . Bush arrived in Singapore early on the morning of November 16, beginning his week-long tour of Asia.
 His welcome was given by Singapore's Deputy Prime Minister, Wong Kan Seng, then he discussed trade and terrorism with Singapore's Prime Minister, Lee Hsien Loong.
 A week after the defeats in the midterm elections, Bush told the public about expanding trade with Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed to send the Clean Air Act to a cross-party committee for a second reading, following a 25-minute meeting with NDP leader Jack Layton at the PMO Tuesday.
 At a meeting with the Prime Minister, Layton asked for changes and to completely rewrite the Conservative Party's environmental legislation.
 Since the Federal Government intervened and took over the funding of Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, some state government and some Federal Parliamentarians have criticised the move as a ploy in the lead up to the Federal election due in November.
 But Premier John Howard said it was done only to protect the hospital from a cut in funding by the Tasmanian government of 45 million Australian dollars.
 According to the latest tide gauge readings, a tsunami was approaching.
 From Tonga, no reports of serious damage or casualties were received, but there was a temporary power outage, which, according to available data, did not allow the Tongan authorities to receive a tsunami warning sent by the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii, located on the coast or near it, were closed Wednesday, despite the cancellation of warnings.
 President George W . Bush welcomed this announcement.
 Bush's Gordon John Dudd called the North Korean promise a big step on the road to achieving verifiable nuclear disarmament of the Korean peninsula.
 Today in the Atlantic ocean formed a Subtropical cyclone Jerry, this is the tenth cyclone in this season of hurricanes in the Atlantic ocean.
 According to the National Hurricane Center, at this point, Jerry poses no threat on land.
 According to the chief of the U S . Army Corps of engineers, six inches of rain could have breached the damaged dams.
 The ninth administrative district, flooded 20 feet during Hurricane Katrina, is now under water because the dam nearby was not high enough to hold back the water.
 Water is spilled over the dam at a width of 100 feet.
 Commons administrator Adam Kerden expressed his disappointment in the removals in his conversation with Wikinews last month.
 Wales said, essentially, that he lied to us from the very beginning, first by acting as though it was necessary to do so for legal reasons,
 The public outcry led to the current development of a regulation regarding sexual content for the site, which hosts millions of openly licensed media.
 The work that was done was mainly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate observations of the Galaxy in Sagittarius.
 The effect that the team was looking for may be caused by tidal forces between the dark matter of the Galaxy and the dark matter of the Milky Way.
 As the moon pulls the earth, causing tides, so the Milky Way affects the Galaxy in Sagittarius.
 Scientists were able to conclude that dark matter affects other dark matter just as it does with ordinary matter.
 According to this theory, a significant portion of the dark matter around the Galaxy is in the form of a halo and consists of a large number of small particles.
 In television reports, there is white smoke coming from the plant.
 Local authorities warn residents living near the station to stay indoors, turn off air conditioners and not to drink water from the tap.
 According to Japan's nuclear management authority, radioactive cesium and iodine were detected at the plant.
 Authorities are suggesting that this indicates a possible breach and leakage in the uranium fuel containers on the site.
 In the South African region of KwaZulu-Natal, Dr Tony Moll,
 In an interview, he said the new strain was causing very great concern, as it was leading to very high levels of mortality.
 Some patients may have been infected in the hospital, thinks Dr Moll, and at least two were health care workers at the hospital.
 One infected person can infect from 10 to 15 people in close contact.
 However, the percentage of people with TB with multiple drug resistance in a whole group of TB patients still seems low, 6000 out of a total of 330,000 infected at a given moment in South Africa.
 Satellites, each of which weighed more than 1,000 pounds and moved at a speed of about 17,500 miles per hour, collided at an altitude of 491 miles above the surface of the earth.
 Scientists say the blast caused by the collision was very powerful.
 They are still trying to determine how big an impact it will have on the earth.
 The strategic command of the U S . Department of defense is leading the search for debris.
 The results of the analysis of the graphs will be posted on a publicly accessible Website.
 The charge of murder with aggravating circumstances will be filed against a doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, after her mother was found dead in the trunk of her car Wednesday, authorities in Ohio said.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, lying on the ground in a T-shirt and underwear and, apparently, in a state of severe narcotic intoxication.
 She sent officers to her black OLDSMOBILE intrigue, which was in 500 feet.
 There they found the body of 53-year-old Sarodjibalasubramaniam, covered in blood-soaked sheets.
 Police said the body was likely there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease this season were reported in July.
 The carriers are pigs, from which the disease is then transmitted to humans via mosquitoes.
 This outbreak prompted the Indian government to take such measures as installing traps for pigs in severely affected areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying pesticides.
 The government also promised several million vaccine doses against encephalitis, which will help prepare health institutions for next year.
 Plans to deliver vaccines to historically the most affected areas this year have been delayed due to a lack of funding and low priority compared to other diseases.
 In 1956, Slajn moved to Sweden, where three years later he began working for the Swedish postal company, and became their chief engraver.
 He created more than 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 His works are so well known for their quality and detail that he is one of the few "namesakes" among philatelists, some specializing only in collecting his works.
 His magnificent thousand-kronor 2000-year-old reproduction of the great deeds of Swedish Kings, David-Klecker Ernestral, is in the Guinness book of world records.
 Besides, he occupied himself with the engraving of banknotes for many countries, recent examples of his work being the portraits of the Prime Minister on the front of the new Canadian bank notes of five and one hundred dollars.
 After the accident, Gibson was rushed to the hospital, but soon died.
 The 64-year-old truck driver in the accident was not injured.
 The car itself was removed from the scene of the accident at around 12:00 GMT.
 The man working in the garage near the place where the accident happened said,
 All of the truck driver's family ran away from the scene of the accident.
 Other issues on the agenda at Bali include saving the world's forests and exchanging technologies to help developing countries grow with less pollution.
 The UN also hopes to complete the creation of a fund to help countries suffering from global warming to combat its effects.
 These funds can go to building houses that are resilient to flooding, to using water resources rationally, and to diversifying agricultural crops.
 Fluck wrote that attempts to silence women about women's health had been unsuccessful.
 She came to this conclusion based on numerous positive comments and support she received from both women and men, arguing that contraceptives should be viewed as a medical necessity.
 When the fight ended, after the wounded were taken to the hospital, about 40 inmates remained in the yard and refused to return to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to correct the situation, but the demands of the inmates are unclear.
 Between 10:00 and 11:00 PM mountain time, inmates set fire to the yard.
 Soon, guards in protective gear passed through the courtyard and herded the inmates into a corner, using tear gas.
 As a result, firefighters extinguished the fire by 23:35.
 After the construction of the dam in 1963, seasonal floods, which spread sediment down the river, ceased.
 This sediment was required to form beaches and sandbars, which were the habitat of wild animals.
 Two species of fish have gone extinct, and two others, including the bullhead, are endangered.
 Despite the fact that after the flood, the water level will rise only a few feet, authorities hope that this will be enough to restore the eroded sandbars downstream.
 There were no tsunami warnings and, according to the Jakarta Geophysical Agency, there will be no tsunami, as the earthquake's magnitude was not above 6.5.
 Despite the absence of a tsunami threat, residents began to panic and leave the premises of their companies and their homes.
 Although Winifred was ready to cry during the farewell, she made it clear to her fans that she would return.
 This is not a goodbye. This is the closing of one chapter and the opening of a new one.
 According to the final results of Namibia's presidential and parliamentary elections, incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba was re-elected with a large margin.
 The ruling party, the South West African People's Organisation, also retained a majority in the parliamentary elections.
 Coalition and Afghan forces moved into the area to secure the object, and another Coalition aircraft was sent to provide support.
 The fall happened in high terrain, and is believed to have been the result of enemy fire.
 Attempts to search for the crash site are hampered by bad weather and difficult terrain.
 The medical charity, Mango, Doctors without borders and the World Health Organisation have said this is the worst outbreak in the country's history.
 A spokesman for Doctors Without Borders, Richard Vigne, said, quote, Angola is heading for its worst outbreak ever, and the situation in Angola remains very bad.
 The matches began at 10:00 in perfect weather, and if not for the morning shower, which quickly passed, it was an ideal day for Rugby-7.
 Favourites of the tournament from South Africa started with the right note when they won a beautiful victory with a score of 26-00 over Zambia, who are in the fifth position.
 Looking clearly worse against their Southern sisters, South Africa all the while gradually improved their performance as the tournament progressed.
 They distinguished themselves with disciplined defense, mastery of the ball, and superior teamwork, and it was clear that it would not be easy to beat this team.
 Official representatives of the Amsterdam and the museum of Anne Frank say that the tree is infected with a fungus and represents a public danger, as there is a direct threat of its falling.
 His plan was to cut it down on Tuesday, but a court order saved it.
 The diameter of all the entrances to the cave, which were named the Seven Sisters, is at least 100 to 250 meters.
 According to infrared images of night and daytime temperatures, the difference in night and daytime temperatures,
 During the day they are colder than the surrounding surface, and at night warmer.
 Their thermal characteristics are not as stable as those of large caves on earth, which often maintain nearly a constant temperature, but they correspond to what are deep pits in the ground, said Glen Cushing, a geologist with the U S . Geological Survey and the University of Northern Arizona, located in Flagstaff, Arizona.
 In France, voting is traditionally conducted in a low-tech manner: the voter closes himself in a booth and puts a pre-printed list of candidates,
 After the officials verify the voter's identity, he drops the envelope into the ballot box and signs the list of voters.
 France's laws on elections are quite strict, systematizing the procedures.
 Starting in 1988, urns for ballot papers must be transparent so that voters and observers can see that there are no envelopes inside and that no other envelopes have been added, except for those of the people who have been allowed to vote and whose votes have been counted in the proper way.
 Candidates can send their representatives to monitor the process, and volunteers count the votes in a special procedure.
 The Eee PC series, previously introduced worldwide with a focus on factors such as cost and functionality, became a hot topic during the month of information technology in Taipei in 2007.
 But the consumer market for notebooks changed radically after the company ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Excellence Award by the Republic of China in 2007.
 The site of the station describes the show as a traditional radio play with a new and outrageously offensive vision.
 In the initial period of its existence, this show was broadcast only on the site of a long-existing Online radio TogiNet Radio, dedicated to radio conversations.
 In late 2015, TogiNet created AstroNet Radio as a sister radio station.
 Initially, the show was voiced by amateur actors from East Texas.
 According to reports, the mass looting continued throughout the night, as there were no street patrols in Bishkek.
 Bishkek was described by one observer as sinking into anarchy, as groups of people ran the streets and looted consumer goods shops.
 Some of Bishkek's residents blamed the protesters from the south for lawlessness.
 South Africa defeated the All Blacks in the Rugby Union Tri-Nations cup at Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 For Springbox, it ended a five-game losing streak.
 This match was the last for the All-Blacks, who had already won the cup two weeks earlier.
 The final match of the season will be played at Ellis Park in Johannesburg next week when the Springboks play Australia.
 A moderate earthquake occurred Monday in the Western part of Montana at 22:08.
 The U S . Geological Survey and its National Information Service for earthquakes received no urgent reports of damage.
 The epicenter of the earthquake was about 20 km (15 miles) northeast of Dillion and about 65 km (40 miles) south of Butte.
 It was confirmed that the H5N1 strain of bird flu, deadly to humans, had been found in a dead wild duck found Monday on a marsh near Leon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh EU country to be hit by the virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Cases with suspected H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers sued God for the spread of death, destruction, and fear to millions and millions of earth's inhabitants.
 Agnostic Chambre's claim that his suit was not serious and that anyone could sue anyone.
 History, as recounted in the French opera by Camille Saint-Saens, tells of a painter whose life is ruled by a love of drugs and Japan.
 As a result, actors smoke joints on stage, and the theater itself encourages the public to join in.
 Former Speaker of the House Newt Gingrich, Texas governor Rick Perry and Congressman Michele Bachmann took the fourth, fifth and sixth spots respectively.
 After the results were known, Gingrich praised Santorum, but harshly criticized Romney, from whom Santorum had broadcast negative information against Gingrich in Iowa.
 Perry said he would return to Texas to assess the results of today's party meeting and determine whether he should continue the race, but later said he would continue and would participate in the South Carolina primary on January 21.
 Bachmann, who won a straw poll in Ames in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan Usc medical center in Los Angeles, where he subsequently died.
 According to reports, he was between 20 and 30 years old, and in a statement, Bieber said, quote,
 TMZ, a celebrity news and gossip site, alleges that the photographer stopped his car on the opposite side of Sepulveda Boulevard and tried to take pictures of the police stopping traffic, before he was ordered to cross the street and continue.
 According to police, the driver of the car that hit the photographer will likely not be charged with a crime.
 Given that in a day, only eighteen medals could be won, a number of countries failed to make the top of the podium.
 They include the Netherlands with Anna Jochemsen, who yesterday finished ninth in the women's giant slalom, and Finland with Kati Saari, who finished tenth in the same event.
 Australia's Mitchell Gurley came in eleventh in the men's standing Super-G. Czech Ondrej Elik came in sixteenth in the men's standing Super-G.
 Arli Velasquez of Mexico finished fifteenth among men in the super giant in the sitting position, and New Zealand's Adam Hall finished ninth among men in the super giant in the standing position.
 Polish skier with vision impairment Maciej Krezel and sport leader Anna Ogarzynska finished thirteenth in the super giant.
 UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the earthquake in 2010 are accused of spreading the disease, which began near their military camp.
 As the suit says, the UN camp's waste did not undergo proper sanitary treatment, resulting in bacteria getting into the Artiibonite River, one of the largest in Haiti.
 Before the arrival of troops, the state of Haiti had not faced problems related to this disease since the beginning of the nineteenth century.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy cited an independent study that suggests the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion unintentionally brought the disease to Haiti.
 Daniel Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease, said the outbreak was probably caused by the peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the patient had been admitted to Howard University hospital in a stable condition.
 The patient visited Nigeria, where a number of cases of infection with the Ebola virus were detected.
 In the hospital, infection control protocols were followed, including keeping the patient separate to prevent the possibility of infection of other patients.
 Before the Simpsons, Simon worked in various jobs on several shows.
 In the 1980s, he worked in such shows as Taxi, the funny company and the show Tracy Ullman.
 In 1989, together with Brooks and Groening, he helped create the Simpsons and was responsible for the first team of writers of the series.
 Despite leaving the show in 1993, he remained executive producer and every season still received tens of millions of dollars in fees.
 Earlier, the Chinese news agency Xinhua reported that the plane had been hijacked.
 Later, it was reported that the plane had received a bomb threat and it was diverted back to Afghanistan, landing in Kandahar.
 Early reports said the plane had returned to Afghanistan after being denied an emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, where an aging air fleet is used for both civilian and military operations.
 International sanctions have made it impossible to buy new airplanes.
 Earlier this week, three people were killed and three more injured when a police plane crashed.
 Last year in Iran, the worst air crash in years occurred when a plane bound for Armenia crashed, killing 168 people on board.
 In the same month, another airliner skidded off the runway in Mashhad and crashed into a wall, killing seventeen people.
 Aerosmith canceled the rest of their tour.
 The rock group was supposed to tour the U S . and Canada until September 16.
 They canceled the tour after the lead singer, Steve Tyler, received a trauma when he fell off the stage during a concert on August 5.
 Murray lost the first set in a tie-break after both men had been able to return absolutely every serve in the set.
 Del Potro had an early advantage in the second set, but it also required a tie-break after reaching 6-6.
 At the moment, Poitras was given medical assistance for his shoulder and he was able to return to the game.
 The program began at 8:30 PM local time (or 15:00 UTC).
 Famous singers from all over the country performed bhajans or songs of devotion at the feet of Sri Shyam.
 The evening began with singer Sandhya Sharma, followed by Jay Shankar Chaudhari, who presented the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan also.
 Then Lakha Singh took over the leadership in singing bhajans.
 Bab Shyam was offered 108 trays of chapan-bhog (in Hinduism, 56 different items, including sweets, fruits, nuts and other dishes, presented to the deity).
 Lakkh Singh performed the Chhappan Bhog Bajan.
 President Nintendo Satoru Iwata presented the design of the new Nintendo Revolution game console at the main presentation of the Tokyo Game Show on Thursday.
 In the Controller, which looks like a television remote, two sensors are used, one next to the user's television, which calculate his position in three-dimensional space.
 Through the movement of the device in the air, players will be able to control actions and movements in video games.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and finished the race soon after the start.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso was the leader most of the race, but finished it just after a pit stop, probably because of a badly tightened right front tire.
 Michael Schumacher finished shortly after Alonso, due to damage to the suspension caused by numerous attempts at overtaking during the race.
 She's very Sympathetic and very well sung,
 I was completely and genuinely touched every time we rehearsed it.
 About three minutes after launch, a board camera showed multiple pieces of insulation foam flying away from the fuel tank.
 However, it is supposed that they did not cause any damage to the shuttle.
 The head of NASA's shuttle program, Nasa's N . Wayne Hale, said the pen fell off after a period of time that caused our concern.
 Five minutes before the salute began, the wind began to increase, a minute later the wind reached 70 kilometers per hour.
 I lost my sister and her friend, and on my path there were two invalids in wheelchairs, people just jumped over them and pushed them,
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating in standard mode.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported no effects from the earthquake, and also that reactors number one and number two at its Sikka nuclear power station had been shut down.
 It's reported that about 9,400 homes in the region are without water and about 100 without electricity.
 Some roads are damaged, some railroads are interrupted, and the airport in Ishikawa Prefecture is still closed.
 One of the bombs exploded near the office of the governor-general.
 Three more bombs exploded near government buildings within two hours.
 According to some reports, the official death toll reaches eight, and official tallies confirm that up to 30 people were injured, but the final figures are still unknown.
 In urine samples from animals that died after eating contaminated food for animals, both cyanuric acid and melamine were detected.
 Researchers at the University reported that these two compounds react with each other, forming crystals that can block the function of the kidneys.
 During the observations, researchers discovered crystalline formations that arise in cat urine when cyanuric acid and melamine are added.
 When comparing using infrared Fourier spectroscopy, it was found that the composition of these crystals corresponded to crystals found in the urine of affected domestic animals.
 I don't know if you're aware or not, but a large part of the goods from Central America were brought into this country duty free.
 Nevertheless, eighty percent of our goods were taxed according to the tariffs in the countries of Central America.
 This did not seem to me to have any meaning, of course it was not fair.
 I tell people that they will be treated the way they treat others.
 Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a law banning the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 The law requires computer games with violence to be sold in California with a sticker that says, eighteen, and that selling games to minors is a 1,000 dollar fine for each violation.
 Today morning, the general prosecutor, Kier Starmer, a titled Royal advocate, made a statement about the prosecution of both Hoon and Prais.
 Hughes resigned, and in the cabinet his place was to be taken by a member of Parliament, Ed Davey, who was expected to take over the business portfolio from Norman Lamb.
 Hoon and Price are due to appear in Westminster magistrates' court on February 16.
 Killed were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Caddeb, 21, who was the driver.
 Edgar Vegilla received injuries to his hand and jaw, while Christopher Schneider needed reconstructive surgery on his face.
 Uki's weapon had malfunctioned when it was aimed at the fifth man, Schneider felt a constant, unceasing pain, he was blind on one eye, he had a missing part of his skull, and his face was reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider gave his testimony via Video-Link from a U S . Air Force base at home.
 Besides Wednesday's competition, Carpendale participated in two individual events at the championships.
 Her first event was a slalom, in which she failed to finish the first run, with 36 of the 116 participants having the same result in that race.
 In another race, this time in the giant slalom, she finished tenth among women in a combined time of 4:41.30, two minutes and sixteen seconds slower than the Austrian winner Claudia Leitner and one minute and nine seconds slower than the Hungarian ninth place finisher Diengyi Danci.
 Four skiers in the women's sitting group failed to complete their runs, and forty five of one hundred and seventy seven skiers in the giant slalom failed to finish.
 The police of Madhya Pradesh returned the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 Yesterday, Martelly swore in a new Provisional Electoral Council (CEP) of nine members.
 The accused have names Babakandjhar, Bhuta Kandjhar, Rampro Kandjhar, and Vishnu Kandjhar.
 The chief of police, Chandra Shekhar Solanki, said the accused were presented before the judges with their faces covered.
 Although three people were inside the building at the time the car crashed into it, no one was injured.
 However, the driver received serious head injuries.
 The road where the accident happened was temporarily closed while emergency services freed the driver of the red Audi TT.
 Initially he was hospitalised at James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 In the end, he was transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Edinburgh sheriff court later brought a charge of murder against Adekoe for the killing of her son.
 She is in custody awaiting a charge and trial, but any witness statements could be tainted, as her popularity was widely used by the media.
 This is common practice in other parts of the UK, but Scottish law works differently, and the courts found publication of the photographs potentially damaging.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee notes that, quote, journalists seem to be truly walking a dangerous line by publishing photos and other details about suspects.
 The Royal Prosecutor's office, which is generally responsible for prosecution, told reporters that no further comments would be made, at least until a verdict was delivered.
 The document, according to the leak, would concern a dispute over borders Palestine wants to establish based on those that existed before the Six-Day War of 1967.
 Other touched on issues, as reported, include the future status of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both peoples, and the issue of the Jordan River Valley.
 Israel demands a permanent military presence in the valley for ten years after the signing of the agreement, while the PNA is willing to keep such a presence for only five years.
 The stalkers, who participated in the additional test for pest control, had to be under the close supervision of the Rangers, since this test was under observation and its effectiveness was evaluated.
 As part of the NPWS and the New South Wales Association of Sporting Shooters partnership, the NPWS Association of Sporting Shooters recruited qualified volunteers.
 According to Mike O'Flynn, the acting director of the Wildlife and National Parks service, four of the shooters selected for the first shooting operation had undergone a comprehensive training and safety briefing.
 Yesterday, Martey, led to the oath of a new Temporary Electoral Council, consisting of nine participants.
 This is the fifth CEP Marteau in four years.
 Last month, the Presidential Commission recommended that the previous Temporary Election Council resign as part of a package of measures to move the country towards new elections.
 The Commission became a response to the mass protests against the state regime that began in October.
 These sometimes violent protests were sparked by the failure to hold elections, some of which were supposed to have taken place as early as 2018.
 There were about 60 cases of iPod overheating, resulting in six fires and four people receiving minor burns.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry of Japan (METI) said it was aware of 27 cases involving these devices.
 Last week, the Ministry of Economy, Labor and Industry announced that apple had informed it of 34 additional cases of overheating, which the company called non-serious.
 In response, the ministry called the delay in reporting the issue to the government a very unfortunate one.
 At 07:19 a m local time (21:19 GMT on Friday), a earthquake struck in the Mariana Islands.
 The Northern Mariana Islands emergency management agency said there were no reports of damage in the country.
 The Pacific tsunami warning center also said there were no signs of a tsunami.
 A former Philippine police officer hijacked a tourist bus in Manila, the capital of the Philippines, and took Hong Kong tourists hostage.
 Rolando Mendoza fired his M16 at tourists.
 Several hostages were rescued, and at least six were confirmed dead at the time.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released earlier, as were the Filipino photographers.
 Later, photographers took the place of the elderly woman, as she had left to go to the toilet. Mendoza was shot.
 Ligginis went in his father's footsteps and began a career in medicine.
 He trained as a gynaecologist and began working at the National women's hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 When Liggins worked at the hospital, in his free time, he began to investigate cases of premature birth.
 His research showed that if you inject the hormone, it will enhance the maturation of the child's lungs in the period of development of the foetus.
 As Xinhua reported, on Wednesday state investigators found two black boxes or, in other words, the cockpit voice recorder and the flight data recorder.
 Fellow-Rustlers too paid tribute to the moon.
 Here's what Tommy Driemr said, quote, the moon became the first Queen of Extreme.
 Dustin Goldast Rannells said, the moon was just as Chum-Y as I . Maybe even more Chum-Y . I love her and I'll Miss her . I hope she's in a better place.
 Of the 1,400 people surveyed in the lead-up to the Federal Election in 2010, the number of those opposed to Australia becoming a Republic rose by 8 per cent from 2008.
 Acting Prime Minister Julia Gillard during the 2010 Federal election campaign, expressed the view that Australia should become a Republic after the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 34% of those surveyed share this view and want Queen Elizabeth II to be the last monarch of Australia.
 A poll showed the following: 29 percent of respondents are sure that Australia should as soon as possible become a Republic, and 31 percent believe that it does not need this form of government.
 Olympic gold medallist was due to compete in the 100 and 200m freestyle and three relay events at the Commonwealth Games, but his physical form is now in doubt.
 He was unable to take the pain medication he needed because it was banned in the games.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and professor of computer science at the University of Central Missouri, opened the largest known prime number to date on January twenty five.
 On Tuesday, it was announced that several people had confirmed this discovery using various hardware and software.
 Comets may have been the source of water on earth, and also the source of organic materials that can form proteins and support life.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, especially how the earth formed, because comets have been hitting the earth very long ago.
 Cuomo, 53, began his tenure as governor in early this year and signed a bill legalizing same-sex marriage last month.
 He called the rumors political nonsense and stupidity.
 It's assumed that he will run for President in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that, according to the Federal Aviation Administration, will allow planes to fly shorter routes and save millions of gallons of fuel each year, as well as reduce carbon emissions.
 It uses satellite technology instead of the old technology based on ground-based radar, which will allow air traffic controllers to more accurately determine the position of planes and give pilots more accurate information.
 No additional transport has been put into service to Wembley, there will be no stopping of ground trains, and there are no surface parking and pick-up points.
 Fears about the absence of transport sparked speculation that the game might have to be played behind closed doors without fans.
 In a study published Thursday in the Journal Science, it's described as a new species of bird on the Galapagos Islands off Ecuador.
 Researchers from Princeton University in the USA and Uppsala University in Sweden reported that, because of mating between the endemic Darwin's finch Geospiza fortes with the introduced cactus finch Geospiza conirostris, a new species evolved in just two generations, although it was thought that this process would take much longer.
 Gold can be given any form. It can be cast into very small forms.
 It can be stretched into a thin wire, which can be twisted and plaited, it can be Chained or Skeined,
 It can be made very thin and attached to another metal.
 This is called the pH of a chemical. You can make an indicator using the juice of red cabbage.
 Cabbage juice changes color depending on how acidic or alkaline the chemical substance is.
 The pH of a solution is determined by the degree of hydrogen ionization of the chemical compound being tested.
 Ions are the most social cats, living in large groups called prides.
 Get a new mixture by mixing two dry powders in one container, then with clean, moist hands, form a ball.
 The moisture on your hands will react with the top layer, which will be unusually, then form a kind of a shell.
 Almost in every house of Harappa and Mohenjo-Daro there was a toilet with a flush, connected to a complex sewage system.
 Preserved fragments of sewage systems have been discovered in the Minoan cities on the islands of Crete and Santorini in Greece.
 Toilets were also in ancient Egypt, Persia, and China. In the Roman civilization, toilets were sometimes part of public baths, where men and women would bathe together.
 When you call someone thousands of miles away, you use a satellite.
 A satellite in space receives a call and practically instantly reflects it back down.
 A satellite was delivered to space by a rocket. Scientists use telescopes in space because the atmosphere of the earth somewhat distorts our light and our view.
 To launch a satellite or telescope into space, a giant rocket taller than 100 feet is needed.
 The wheel has changed our world in innumerable ways, the most important being that it has given us much more rapid and easier transportation.
 It gave us the train, the automobile, and many other transportation means.
 Underneath them are larger cats, which eat prey ranging in size from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 And finally, many small cats, including house cats, eat and hunt many more small animals, like insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The secret of their success is in the niche concept, a special job that each kind of cat performs, which keeps it from competition with other kinds.
 Lions are the most social cats, living in large groups called prides.
 The pride includes from one to three adult males, who are related, as well as females and young, the number of which can reach thirty.
 Females usually are related to each other and form a large family of sisters and daughters.
 Lion prides behave very much like a pack of wolves or dogs, animals that, by nature, are surprisingly similar to lions,
 being all-round developed athletes, tigers can climb trees though not very well, swim, jump great distances and pull with the strength of five strong men
 Tigers belong to the same family as lions, leopards, and jaguars, the Panthera,
 A tiger's roar is not like a lion's roar, it's more like a tiger's roar.
 Ocelots love to eat small animals, if a chance presents itself, they will hunt monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds almost all of which are much smaller than the ocelot.
 Scientists believe that ocelots follow the trail of animals and find their prey by smelling their movements on the ground.
 They are able to see very well in the dark with night vision and almost invisibly move around.
 When a small group of living organisms (a small population) separates from the main population from which they originated, for example, if they cross a mountain range or a river, or if they move to a new Island from which they cannot easily return,
 This new environment has other resources and other competitors, so the new population will need other characteristics or changes compared to what it had before to become a strong competitor.
 The starting population has not changed at all, it still needs the same adaptations it did before.
 Over time, as a new population begins to adapt to a new environment, it begins to look less and less like the rest of the population.
 Over time, through thousands or even millions of years, these two populations will look so different that it cannot be said that they are the same species.
 We call this process the formation of species, that is, the emergence of new species.
 Plants produce oxygen, which humans breathe, and absorb carbon dioxide, which humans exhale.
 Plants eat sunlight using photosynthesis, and they also cast shade.
 We build our homes and make clothes from plants, most of our food is plants, and without plants, animals could not survive.
 Mozawv was the most formidable of his time, so he feared no one but other Mozawvrs.
 His long jaws were studded with more than seventy sharp teeth, and he had an additional row of teeth on his palate, so that there was no escape for those who met him.
 We certainly do not know, but it is not excluded that his tongue was divided, that he ate turtles, large fish, other Moasaur, and may have been a cannibal.
 He also attacked anything that went into the water, even a giant dinosaur like Tyrannosaurus would not have been a match for him.
 Despite the fact that most of their food would be familiar to us, the Romans had their own strange and unusual dishes, served up at feasts.
 There was another difference: while poor people and women ate sitting on chairs, the rich liked to have joint feasts, during which they ate, lying on their sides.
 The diet of ancient Romans could not include foods that came to Europe from America or Asia in the following centuries.
 In particular, they had no corn, no tomatoes, no potatoes, no cacao, and no ancient Roman had ever tasted Indian food.
 The Babylonians built each of their gods a main sanctuary, considered the god's home.
 People made sacrifices to the gods, and priests tried to please the desires of the gods at ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and an inner sanctum, which only priests could enter.
 Sometimes, as elements of the temple, special towers in the form of pyramids were built, called zikkurats.
 The top of the tower represented a special sanctuary for the god.
 In the warm climate of the Near East, home was of little significance.
 Most of the Jewish family's life was spent outdoors.
 Women prepared food in the yard, shops were open-air, and stone was used for building houses.
 In the land of Canaan there were no great forests, so wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated, and in Scandinavian Sagas it is told that Eric the Red was exiled from Iceland for murder, and, moving further west, he discovered Greenland and gave it its name.
 Soon after the outbreak of hostilities, Britain initiated a naval blockade of Germany.
 Although each of the countries was Scandinavian, there were many differences between the Danes, Swedes, Norwegians, and Icelanders.
 If you watched the movie National Treasure, you might think that the Declaration of Independence had a map of treasure on the reverse side.
 However, this is not true. Although something is written on the back of the document, it is not a treasure map.
 On the reverse side of the Declaration of Independence, it reads, "The Declaration of Independence was signed July fourth, 1776.
 Though no one knows for certain who wrote it, it is known that at the beginning of its existence this large parchment document, which is 29¾ by 24½ inches, was rolled up for more convenient storage.
 Thus it is quite possible that the recording was added simply as a marker.
 In the result of operation Neptune and the subsequent battles, the North of France was liberated, but the South was still not liberated.
 It was under the control of the Vichy French, who had made peace with the Germans in 1940 and worked with the invaders instead of opposing them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded the South of France, dubbed the operation Dragoon.
 In all, in just 2 weeks, the Free French and the Americans liberated the South of France and headed towards Germany.
 Civilization is a distinct culture, but one that is shared by a large group of people living and working together, a society.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin civilis, which means citizen, and is a relative of the Latin words civis, meaning citizen, and civitas, meaning city or city-state, and it also expresses the size of a society.
 Cities are the pre-teachers of nations, civilization implies transmission of knowledge through several generations, a continuous cultural presence and a continuous cultural spread.
 Small cultures often disappear without leaving corresponding historical evidence, and therefore cannot be recognized as genuine civilizations.
 During the war for independence, thirteen States, in accordance with the articles of confederation, formed a weak central government, the only body of which was the Congress.
 Congress had no taxing power, and since there was no national executive or judicial power, it relied on the States, which often refused to cooperate and refused to enforce all its acts.
 He also had no power to overturn state tax laws and tariffs.
 For amendments to be approved, according to the articles, a unanimous approval of all States was required, but States so irresponsibly treated the central government that their representatives often were absent.
 The Italian football team, along with the German team, is the second most successful team in the world and won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, Rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula One auto racing are popular sports.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern regions of Italy, where people from these regions participate in international competitions and the Olympics.
 In Japan, there are approximately 7,000 Islands, the largest of which is Honshu, making Japan the 7th largest Island in the world.
 However, due to its belonging to the cluster of Islands, Japan is often called an archipelago from a geographical point of view.
 Taiwan began its history many years ago, in the fifteenth century, when European seafarers, passing by, wrote down the name of the island as Ilha Formosa, or the beautiful Island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India company founded a base on the southwest of Taiwan, initiating a transformation of aboriginal methods of grain production and hiring Chinese workers to work on their rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, the forces of the Qing dynasty (1644-1912) took control of the Western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan and in 1885 declared Taiwan a province of the Qing Empire.
 In 1895, after the defeat in the Sino-Japanese war, the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, which ceded Taiwan to Japan, which ruled the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu consists of three main structures, namely, Intihuatana, the temple of the sun, and the room of three windows.
 Most of the buildings on the edges of the complex have been rebuilt to give tourists a more accurate idea of how they originally looked.
 By 1976, 30% of Machu Picchu had been restored, and work continues to this day.
 For example, the most common format for static photos is 35 mm, and this size was the dominant size of film on the cusp of the analog era.
 Today it's still made, but more importantly, it's the ratio of its sides that have inherited the size of images from Digital cameras.
 The 35 mm format is actually somewhat confusing, it has a width of 36 mm and a height of 24 mm.
 The ratio of sides of this format (divided by twelve to get a ratio with small integers) is therefore accepted as 3:2.
 Many common formats, such as the APS family, are equal to or close to these proportions.
 Too often used and often derided, the rule of thirds is a simple recommendation that creates dynamism while maintaining a certain degree of order in the image.
 It says that the best place to put the main object is at the intersection of the lines dividing the image into three parts vertically and horizontally.
 During this period of European history, the Catholic Church, having become rich and powerful, became the object of intense scrutiny.
 For more than a thousand years, Christianity united European states despite differences in languages and traditions.
 Her all-pervading power touched every one, from King to peasant.
 One of the main Christian principles is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that the church's money exists for that purpose.
 The center of church power based in Rome for more than a thousand years, and such a concentration of power and wealth led many to question whether this dogma was being observed.
 Soon after the beginning of the war, Britain imposed a naval blockade on Germany.
 This strategy proved effective, cutting off vital military and civilian supplies, though this blockade violated accepted international laws, as set out in several international agreements over the last two hundred years.
 Britain mined international waters to prevent ships entering whole sectors of oceans, putting even neutral ships at risk.
 As the reaction to this tactic was muted, Germany expected a similar reaction to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 Among most citizens and peoples in the 1920s, attitudes like pacifism and isolation prevailed.
 Knowing the horrors and atrocities of World War I, states wanted to avoid a similar situation in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States and accepted a job offer to work in Edison's company in New York City.
 He arrived in the U S . with four cents in his pocket, a book of poems, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, who was his boss at the previous job, to Thomas Edison.
 In ancient China, a unique way of designating periods of time was used, each period of China or each family that was in power, was a distinct dynasty.
 Besides, between the reigns of each dynasty, there was disunity and instability. The most famous was the Three-Reign era, which lasted 60 years during the Han and the Qin dynasties.
 During this period, there were fierce military actions between many noble people, fighting for the throne.
 The era of the three kingdoms was one of the bloodiest periods in ancient China's history, thousands of people died fighting for a place on the throne in a big Palace in Xi'An.
 There are many such social and political effects, such as the use of the metric system, the transition from absolutism to republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the country belongs to the people, not to a single ruler.
 Also after the Revolution, opportunities opened up to all men, allowing the most ambitious and talented to succeed.
 The same applies to the Army, because ranks began to be based on qualities, not on origin.
 The French Revolution also inspired many other repressed representatives of the working class in other countries to begin their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was very interested in topics not related to worldly life, he often visited a cave which became known as the Hira on Mount Nur for reflection.
 A cave which has survived to our days gives us a very vivid idea of Muhammad's spiritual aspirations.
 The cave is located on the top of a mountain to the North of Mecca and is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 It's very hard to detect even for someone who knows about its existence in a cave, a person finds himself in complete isolation.
 There is nothing visible but a pure, beautiful sky above and a multitude of surrounding mountains.
 The great pyramid at Giza is the only one of the seven wonders of the world that still exists today.
 The great pyramid was built by the Egyptians in the third century BC and is one of many large pyramidal structures built to honor the memory of a Pharaoh.
 The plateau of Giza, or the Necropolis of Giza, in the Egyptian Valley of the Dead, includes several pyramids,
 The great pyramid was created in honor of Pharaoh Khufu, and many smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built in honor of Khufu's wives and relatives.
 The sign for movement of the squeeze in upward direction looks like a V, and the sign for movement of the squeeze in downward direction looks like a squiggle or a square without the bottom side.
 The up bow mark looks like a V and the down bow mark looks like a staple or a square missing its bottom side.
 The movement of the smycche upwards usually makes a softer sound, while the movement of the smycche downwards makes a more powerful and more forceful sound.
 You can draw your own shading, but remember that shading is printed for musical reasons, and it's usually worth following.
 On October 6, 1789, a furious crowd of women from the market forced the King, Louis XVI, his queen, Marie-Antoinette, their two small children, Marie-Therese, age eleven, and Louis-Charles, age four, and the King's sister, Madame Elizabeth,
 They returned to Paris in a carriage, surrounded by a crowd of people who shouted threats at the King and the Queen.
 The crowd of people forced the King and the Queen to open the windows wide.
 At one point, a member of the crowd waved a head of a Royal Guardsman killed in Versailles in front of the terrified queen.
 The military expenses of American imperialism to conquer the Philippines were paid by the Filipinos themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the American colonial regime to pay for most of the expenses and interest on bonds moved on behalf of the Philippine government through Wall Street banking houses.
 Of course, the super profits brought by the long exploitation of the Filipinos constituted the main source of American imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, one has to understand the context that prompted them to create the order.
 The epoch in which these events took place is commonly called the High Middle Ages, a period of European history that spanned the eleventh, twelfth, and thirteenth centuries.
 The high Middle Ages succeeded the earlier Middle Ages and preceded the late Middle Ages, which, according to the accepted view, ended around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term encompassing a wide range of practical ideas, from technological progress or technological imperative to a strict point of view that the fates of humans are driven by a fundamental logic associated with the laws of science and their manifestation in technologies.
 Most views of technological determinism share two general ideas: that the direction of technological development is virtually incapable of cultural or political influence, and that, in turn, the "effects" of technology on society are caused by its own properties, not by society.
 For example, one might say that the automobile is a necessary cause of road development.
 However, the nationwide road network is economically unfeasible for only a small group of vehicles, so new methods of production are being developed to lower the cost of ownership.
 Massive ownership of automobiles also leads to an increase in the number of road accidents, which leads to the invention in health care of new methods of treating the injuries received.
 Romanticism in many ways included cultural determinism, drawn from writers such as Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 In the context of romanticism, geography shaped the people, and over time, customs and culture emerged that, while being in harmony with the place of residence of that society, were better than the arbitrary laws that were imposed.
 Paris is called the fashion capital of the modern world, just as Constantinople was considered the fashion capital of feudal Europe.
 Slavery about him as a center of luxury began about 400 BC and lasted until about 1100 BC.
 His status declined over the twelfth century mainly because the crusaders returned with such gifts as silk and spices, which were valued higher than the goods offered on the Byzantine markets.
 At this moment, and the title of the capital of fashion transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 Gothic style reached its peak between the X-XI and the XIV centuries.
 At first, clothing was under the strong influence of Byzantine culture in the East.
 However, because of slow communication channels, styles in the West may lag 25 to 30 years.
 Own styles began to develop in Western Europe by the end of the Middle Ages, one of the biggest achievements of that time, thanks to the Crusades, was the use of buttons to fasten clothing.
 Natural farming is a form of agriculture that is practiced to produce enough food to satisfy the needs of only the farmer and his or her family.
 Natural farming is a simple, often organic, system of agriculture using seeds from plants that grow in a given ecosystem, along with the use of crop rotation and other relatively simple methods to increase yield.
 Historically, most farmers engaged in agriculture for food, and this is still the case in many developing countries.
 Subcultures unite like-minded people who feel alienated by society's standards and allow such people to define themselves.
 Subcultures may vary in age, nationality, social status, place of residence and/or gender of the people from which it is composed.
 Characteristics that define a subculture as distinctive may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Representatives of a certain subculture often declare their belonging through a distinctive and symbolic use of style, including through fashion, manner, and jargon.
 One of the most common methods used to illustrate the importance of socialization is to illustrate several unfortunate cases where children, because of lack of attention, misfortune, or intentional cruelty, did not contact adults during their maturation.
 Such children are called Odd-Child or Wild-Child. Some Odd-Child children isolate themselves from humans, usually their own parents, in some cases, the rejection of their child was a result of the parents' rejection of their child's serious intellectual or physical disability.
 Children living on the streets may have experienced severe forms of violence or trauma before they run away or are abandoned.
 Others, as asserted, were brought up by animals, some of them living in the wild nature by themselves.
 If he is fully reared by animals instead of humans, a Demonized child demonstrates behaviors, practically in all, similar to that of a particular animal that raised him, for example, his fear or indifference to humans.
 While project-based learning should be more simple and interesting, Scaffolding is ahead of many technologies.
 Skaffolding is not a method of teaching, but rather a form of assistance to those who are going through a new learning experience, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 Skaffolding can be virtual and real, in other words, a teacher is a form of Skaffolding, but so is a Screwpish in Microsoft Office.
 Virtual scaffolding, helping in training, is built into the software and designed to remind, explain, and ask questions about procedures that the trainee might otherwise have trouble with.
 Children are passed under the care of many different reasons, from homelessness to abuse and even extortion.
 Children are not supposed to grow up in an environment where nurturing, care and education are not provided, but they do.
 We consider the foster care system to be safe for children.
 Our child protection system should provide safe housing, loving caregivers, stable education and reliable health care.
 Patronage should provide all the necessities which were formerly lacking in the home from which they were previously removed.
 The Internet combines elements of both mass and interpersonal communication.
 Distinctive features of the Internet lead to additional scale in terms of approach and use.
 Thus, it has been suggested that learning and socialization are important motivating factors for Internet use (James et al., 1995).
 Personal involvement and long-term contact were also named by Eimme and McCord (1998) as new dimensions of motivation when they studied how people react to Websites.
 The use of Video-Recordings led to important discoveries in the field of Micro-Expression, the movements of the face lasting a few Milliseconds.
 In particular, it is claimed that one can determine whether a person is lying by using a correct interpretation of his micro expressions.
 In the article, the President, Oliver Sacks, described how people who, because of brain damage, are unable to understand speech, nevertheless can correctly assess the sincerity of a speaker.
 According to his hypothesis, animals, such as domestic dogs, may possess similar abilities to interpret human behaviour.
 Studies that were conducted in the twentieth century showed that there are two types of genetic variability: hidden and expressed.
 Mutation introduces new genetic variation, while selection removes it from the set of available variations.
 Segregation and recombination with each generation tussle the variations between two pools.
 In the savannah, primates with a digestive system like humans have a hard time meeting their amino acid needs from available plant resources.
 More than that, not fulfilling this will lead to such serious consequences as slowing growth, malnutrition and, eventually, death.
 The most available vegetable resources were nuts found in leaves and legumes, but they were poorly digested by such primates as ourselves if not cooked.
 On the contrary, food of animal origin (ants, termites, eggs) is not only easily digested but also represents a rich source of proteins, containing all the basic amino acids.
 Taking all of this into account, it's not surprising that our ancestors solved the protein problem in much the same way that chimpanzees do in the savannah to this day.
 Interrupted sleep is a process of deliberate waking during normal sleep and re-entering sleep shortly thereafter.
 This can be easily done with a relatively quiet alarm clock to wake you up and not to wake you up completely.
 If you find yourself re-setting the alarm clock in your sleep, then you can put it on the other side of the room, which will force you to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other variations, which are based on biological rhythms, include taking large amounts of fluid, particularly water or tea, a known diuretic, before bed, which causes the person to wake up to urinate.
 The amount of inner peace a person has is inversely proportional to the amount of tension in his or her body and soul.
 The lower the tension, the more positive the life force present in you. Every human being potentially is given the ability to find absolute peace and a sense of fulfillment.
 Everyone can achieve enlightenment, the only thing that stands in the way is our own tension and negative attitude.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but was supplemented by the Mahayana path of love and a multitude of Indian yoga techniques.
 The principle of Tibetan Buddhism is very simple it consists of Kundalini yoga, meditation and the path of all-consuming love.
 Energy Kundalini (energy of enlightenment) in Kundalini yoga is awakened through yoga poses, breathing exercises, Mantras and visualization.
 The heart of Tibetan meditation is Yoga of the Deities, through visualization of various Deities, energy channels are cleaned, chakras are activated and enlightenment of the mind is achieved.
 Germany was a common enemy in World War II, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the USA. After the war, disagreements regarding the system, process, and culture led to discord between the countries.
 Two years after the war ended, former allies became enemies, and the cold war began.
 It was to last the next forty years, in which war was waged in earnest, using the armies of proxy, on the fields of battle from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, Cuba, and many other places around the world.
 By September 17, 1939, the Polish defense was already broken, and the only hope was to retreat and reorganize along the Romanian Plateau.
 However, these plans became untenable practically overnight when about 800,000 soldiers from the Soviet Red Army formed the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts after the seizure of Eastern regions of Poland in violation of the Riga peace agreement, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other international agreements, bilateral and multilateral.
 The use of ships for transporting goods is, of course, the most efficient way to transport large numbers of people and goods across oceans.
 The work of seamen traditionally consists in providing the ability of a country to move its people and goods, and at the same time preventing the enemy from moving its people and goods.
 One of the most noteworthy recent examples of this was the company in the North Atlantic during World War II, when the Americans tried to transport people and materials across the Atlantic to help Britain.
 At the same time, the German naval fleet, using mainly its submarines, tried to stop this movement.
 If the Anti-Hitler coalition had failed, Germany, most likely, could have conquered Britain just as it had conquered the rest of Europe.
 Goats, apparently, were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 Ancient cultures and tribes began to leave them for themselves to have milk, wool, meat and skin.
 Domestic goats, as a rule, were kept in herds, which wandered over hills or other places for grazing, which was usually watched over by children or teenagers, which resembles more the more widespread activity of a shepherd.
 Roads for wagons were built in England as early as the sixteenth century.
 Although the horse-drawn roads represented only a series of parallel wooden logs, they gave the horses the ability to carry larger loads and at a slightly higher speed than the slightly more wobbly roads of that time.
 Sleepers began to be used quite a long time ago to keep the rails in place, but it soon became clear that rails were more effective when they were on top of a layer of iron.
 This became a common practice, but iron led to more wear and tear of wooden wagon wheels.
 But over time, wooden wheels were replaced with iron, and in 1767, the first rails made entirely of iron were introduced.
 The first known form of transportation was walking, humans began to walk two million years ago with the appearance of Homo Erectus.
 For their ancestors, Australopithecus, upright walking was not so common.
 Bipedal specializations are found in Australopithecine remains from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, though, possibly, Sahelanthropus walked on two legs as early as 7 million years ago.
 We can start living, caring more about the environment, we can become members of the environmental movement and even activists to try and make a difference.
 As a rule, this looks like treating the symptoms, if we need not just a temporary solution, then we need to find the root of the problem and address it.
 It's quite obvious that the world has changed a lot under the influence of humanity's scientific and technological progress, and because of overpopulation and people's extravagant lifestyles, the problems have become bigger.
 After the Congress, on July 4, a handwritten draft signed by the President, John Hancock, and Secretary Charles Thomson, was sent a few blocks to John Dunlap's printing shop.
 For the night, 150 to 200 copies were made, now known as the Dandelion leaflets.
 The first public reading of this document was made by John Nixon in the yard of Independence hall on July 8.
 On July 6, one copy was sent to George Washington, who on July 9 ordered it to be read to his troops in New York.
 Twenty five Dandelion leaflets known to date are the oldest surviving copies of the document, the original handwritten copy having not survived.
 Today, many paleontologists believe that one of the groups of dinosaurs survived and lived to our day, we call them birds.
 Often they are not considered dinosaurs, because they have feathers and are capable of flight.
 But there are many other things we can say about birds that still look like dinosaurs.
 They have claws and teeth, they lay eggs and walk on two hind legs like a Tyrannosaurus Rex.
 Almost all computers that are used today are based on processing information that is coded in the form of Binary numbers.
 A Binary number can have only one of two values, either 0 or 1. These numbers are called Binary digits, or bits, if you use computer jargon.
 It may be hard to immediately identify oral poisoning, such symptoms as vomiting are too common for a quick diagnosis.
 The best sign of internal poisoning may be the presence of an open container with a medicine or toxic household chemical.
 Read the label, where you'll find specific instructions for first aid in case of poisoning with this particular poison.
 The term bug is used formally by entomologists to refer to a group of insects.
 This notion comes from the well-known bed bugs of ancient times, insects that are well adapted to parasitizing on humans.
 And both predators and bed bugs are nesting species, adapted to live in the nest or home of their host.
 In the USA, approximately 400,000 cases of multiple sclerosis have been detected, making multiple sclerosis the leading neurological disease of young people and middle-aged people.
 Disseminated sclerosis is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which consists of the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 Studies have shown that two times more women than men suffer from Sclerotic disease.
 A couple may decide that raising a child is not in their best interests or in the best interests of their child.
 These couples may choose to create a plan of adoption for their child.
 When a child is adopted or adopted, the biological parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can adopt the child.
 The main goal of science is to figure out how the world works, using the scientific method, which is basically the method of science.
 He, however, is not the only one. Scientific research also is guided by experimentation, asking questions, and making observations.
 Naturalists and philosophers concentrated their attention on the ancient texts and especially on the Bible in Latin.
 In all scientific questions, including psychology, the views of Aristotle were accepted.
 As the knowledge of Greek waned, the West found itself cut off from its philosophical and scientific Greek roots.
 Many of the rhythms in physiology and behaviour are often heavily dependent on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production via biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, not simply a reaction to external periodic stimuli, have been registered in most living organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that will continue autonomous cycling over a period of time even in the absence of external stimuli.
 The Hershey and Chase experiment was one of the first suggestions that DNA was the genetic material.
 Hersh with Chase implanted their DNA into a bacterium with the help of Phage, i.e. viruses.
 They conducted two experiments, marking radioactive phosphorus DNA of phage and radioactive radioactive phosphorus of phage.
 Mutations can cause a large variety of results, depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the affected stretch of genetic material, and whether the mutated cells are part of the germ line.
 Only mutations in the cells of the embryo line can be passed on to children, whereas mutations elsewhere may lead to cell death or cancer.
 Natural tourism is interesting for those who like to go to nature to enjoy the landscape, including wild animals and plants.
 Among the examples of active recreation at the site are hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, visiting parks and learning about the ecosystem.
 An example might be visiting, photographing and studying orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave small towns in rural areas to go to their place of work, and those whose place of work is in the place they just left drive by them.
 In this active transportation movement, every one in some way or other is connected with the system of transportation based on personal automobiles, and supports it.
 Science now indicates that a huge hydrocarbon economy influenced one of the stable states of the biosphere that has supported human evolution for the last two million years.
 Everyone is a member of society and uses transportation systems.
 In developed countries, you rarely hear such complaints about water quality or falling bridges.
 Why do transportation systems receive so many complaints, why do they break down daily? Are transportation engineers simply incompetent? Or are there more fundamental reasons for this?
 The study of movement of individual drivers and vehicles between two points and their interaction with each other is carried out in the framework of transportation flow research.
 Unfortunately, it's hard to study the intensity of traffic because you can't predict the driver's behaviour with one hundred percent certainty.
 Fortunately, the behavior of drivers often is systematic, so transportation flows in general have some systematicity and can be approximated mathematically.
 To better represent the transportation flow, the three main variables were established as follows:  (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) speed.
 These relationships help in planning, design and operation of railroad facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to fly, and their ability to do so helped them escape enemies, find food and mates.
 Most insects have the ability to fold their wings along their body, which gives them an advantage.
 This provides them with a greater number of secluded places in which to hide from predators.
 Dragonflies and damselflies are the only insects that cannot fold their wings back.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus said that the solar system revolved around the sun.
 Many believed that he was right, but many believed the opposite: that the solar system revolved around the earth, including the sun (and even other stars).
 This seems like a reasonable idea, because we don't feel the earth moving, do we?
 The Amazon River is the second longest and the first largest river on earth, carrying more than eight times the volume of the second largest river.
 The Amazon is also the widest River on earth, with a width that sometimes reaches six miles.
 Whole 20 percent of water flowing from rivers into the oceans of our planet flows out of the Amazon.
 The main river of the Amazon has a length of 6,387 km (3,980 miles). It has thousands of small rivers flowing into it.
 Despite the fact that construction of pyramids out of stone continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the size and technical perfection of the pyramids at Giza has never been surpassed.
 In the new Kingdom of ancient Egypt, they were awed by the monuments created by their predecessors more than a thousand years before.
 The Vatican is the smallest independent country in the world, with a population of about 800 people.
 In the Vatican, Italian is used in legislation and official communications.
 Italian is also a daily language for most people working in the state, while Latin is often used in religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of Vatican City are Catholics.
 People from ancient times were aware of the basic chemical elements, such as gold, silver and copper, because they all can be found in nature in pure form and are relatively easy to obtain with primitive tools.
 Aristotle, the philosopher, believed that everything consisted of a mixture of one or more of the four elements, which were earth, water, air and fire.
 They were like four states of matter in the same order: solid, liquid, gas, and plasma, although he also suggested that they transitioned into a new state to get what we see.
 Alloys, by definition, represent a mixture of two or more metals.
 Elements such as calcium and potassium are considered metals, of course, there are also metals such as silver and gold.
 You can also make alloys that contain a small amount of such Non-Metallic elements as Carbon.
 All in the universe is made up of matter, all matter is made up of the smallest particles, called atoms.
 Atoms are so incredibly tiny that three trillion of them could fit in the point at the end of this sentence.
 In this way, the pencil became a good friend to many people when it first appeared.
 It's sad that when new ways of writing appeared, the pencil lost its former status and was less used.
 Nowadays, people write messages on computer screens and never have to deal with a typewriter.
 One can only guess what will become of the keyboard, with the advent of newer technologies.
 Atomic bombs work on the principle that for many protons and neutrons to be in one nucleus, energy is needed.
 It's about as hard as pushing a heavy trolley uphill, then splitting the nucleus again releases some of that energy.
 Some atoms have a unstable nucleus, which means they are prone to decay at little or no effect.
 The surface of the moon consists of rocks and dust. The outer layer of the moon is called the crust.
 The thickness of the bark is about 70 km under the oceans and 100 km under the continents.
 It is thinner under the moon's seas and thicker under the mountains.
 On the visible side, there may be more lunar seas, because the crust there was thinner, lava was easier to rise to the surface.
 Theories of content are concentrated on finding what makes people act or may interest them.
 These theories suggest that humans have certain needs and/or desires that accumulate inside them as they mature.
 These theories turn to what makes concrete people want to do what they do, and what their surroundings make them do or not do certain things.
 Two popular theories about content are Maslow's pyramid of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory of motivation.
 As a rule, two types of behavior can be observed when managers begin to lead people previously equal to them in status.
 Such managers find it difficult to make unpopular decisions, to take disciplinary action, to evaluate the results of work, to distribute responsibilities and to hold employees accountable.
 On the other end of the spectrum, a person turns into an unrecognizable individual who thinks that he or she has to change everything the team did and take it for himself.
 The leader ultimately is responsible for the success or failure of the team.
 This behavior often leads to conflicts between leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams adhere to the same standards of mastery that ordinary teams do, but there are small differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as a point of contact for their immediate physical group.
 They are usually more autonomous than employees from traditional teams, because their teams can meet according to different time zones, which is not always understood by the local management.
 The presence of a present day invisible team also is a unique component of a virtual team.
 The invisible team is the team of managers, before whom every participant reports, and the invisible team establishes norms for each participant.
 Why would an organization go through the laborious process of creating a Self-Learning organization? One of the goals of applying Self-Learning concepts in practice is innovation.
 When all available resources are effectively utilized in all functional divisions of the organization, creativity and innovativeness may manifest.
 In the end, the organization's united work to overcome the obstacle can lead to a new innovative process that will meet the client's interests.
 Before an organization can become innovative, leaders must create a culture of innovation, knowledge sharing and learning from experience.
 Angel (2006) explains the Continuum approach as a method used to help organizations achieve a higher level of effectiveness.
 Neuroscience gives physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of consciousness, and so it narrows the field of study and makes it much more precise.
 The interplay between brain pathology and behaviour is used by scientists in their research.
 Long known that various types of damage, trauma, injury and tumor of the brain affect behavior and cause changes in some mental functions.
 The new technologies allow us to see and study never-before-seen structures and processes in the brain.
 This provides us with a great amount of data and materials to create simulation models that help us understand the processes occurring in our minds.
 Despite the fact that AI is firmly associated with science fiction, it forms a very important direction of computer science, looking at the behavior and learning of machines and the teaching of them intelligence.
 Research in the field of AI includes creating machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Some examples that can be given are control, planning and creating a schedule, reacting to client's diagnoses and questions, and also recognizing a face, handwriting, and voice.
 Such questions are dealt with in separate disciplines, the aim of which is to solve the problems we face in everyday life.
 Nowadays, the I I system is often used in the fields of economics, medicine, engineering, and the military sphere, being embedded in some software applications for home computers and Video games.
 Field trips are very important for any class. Often teachers want to take their students to places they can't get to by bus.
 Technology offers a solution via virtual tours, where students can tour museums, visit an Aquarium, or enjoy fine art while sitting with their class.
 Layouting an excursion in virtual space for all-round viewing is also a great way to refresh an excursion in memory and share your new-found knowledge with future classes.
 For example, each year, Bennett school in North Carolina creates a Website about their visit to the state capital, and each year that Website is updated, but the old versions are still preserved and serve as a memory album.
 Blogs can also improve writing skills in students, although students often begin their Blog using shoddy grammar and spelling, this usually changes over time due to the presence of an audience.
 Because students are often the most critical audience, a Blog author begins to strive for perfection in order to avoid criticism.
 Even by leading a Blog, students begin to better understand the world around them, students are inspired to be smart and interesting by attracting the attention of readers.
 Blogging is a tool that encourages collaboration and it motivates students to extend the learning process far beyond the traditional school day.
 Appropriate use of Blogs can give students the opportunity to become more Analytic and Critical, by actively responding to Online materials, students can determine their position in the context of other people's work, as well as articulate their own views on specific issues.
 Ottawa is a lovely bilingual capital of Canada with a huge number of art galleries and museums that open up the past and present of Canada.
 Further south is Niagara Falls, and to the north is Muskoka and the surrounding areas, which are a wilderness of untouched natural beauty.
 All this and much more makes Ontario something truly Canadian in the eyes of foreigners.
 The larger areas farther north are sparsely settled, and some are practically uninhabited.
 A surprising comparison of population numbers: in the USA there are more African Americans than citizens in Canada.
 East African Islands are located in the Indian ocean off the East Coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is much more than other and is a self-contained continent in terms of wildlife.
 Almost all the smaller Islands are independent States or associated with France and known as Chic Beach resorts.
 Arabs also brought Islam to the region, especially it was rooted on Comoros and Mayotte.
 The spread of European influence and colonization began in the fifteenth century when Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama opened a route through the Cape of Good Hope from Europe to India.
 To the north, the region is bounded by the Sahel, and to the south and west by the Atlantic Ocean.
 For women: all tourists are recommended to say that they are married, regardless of their present family status.
 It is also helpful to wear a ring (but not too expensive looking).
 Women should be aware that because of cultural differences, they may feel that they are being harassed, followed, touched, etc.
 Stand firmly and do not be afraid to stand on your own, regardless of cultural differences.
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the tenth century BC, and was used by the Romans, Phoenicians, and Merinids as a strategic port called Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed it and rebuilt it under the name of Kaz-Branca, but left it after the earthquake of 1755.
 Sultan of Morocco rebuilt the city under the name of Ed-Dar-El-Bayda, and Spanish traders, who had established trading bases there, called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting places for shopping in all Morocco.
 Around the old medina it's easy to find places where traditional Moroccan goods like tajines, pottery, leather goods, kettles and a whole assortment of other trinkets are sold.
 Goma is a tourist town on the very East of the Democratic Republic of Congo, on the border with Rwanda.
 In 2002, the city of Goma was destroyed by lava from the Nyragongo volcano, which buried most of the city's streets, especially the central part of the city.
 Though Goma is a fairly safe place, it is important to check information about any trips outside Goma to understand the state of the fighting in the North Kivu province.
 This city is also a starting point for climbing Mount Nyirangongo, and here you can also see mountain gorillas in the wild at one of the cheapest prices in Africa.
 You can go to Goma on the Bodaboda (motorbike taxi). The usual (local) price is 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 In connection with its relative inaccessibility, Timbuktu became a metaphor for the exotic, far-off land.
 Today, Timbuktu is a dilapidated city, but its reputation draws tourists, and it has an airport.
 In 1990, it was added to the World Heritage List, which is under threat from the dangers of the desert.
 When filming Henry Louis Gates's PBS special, one of the important stops was made here.
 This city is very different from other cities in the country, as it is predominantly Arabic in its appearance, not African.
 Kruger National Park is located in the northeast of South Africa, along the border with Mozambique to the east, with Zimbabwe to the north, and with the Crocodile River to the south.
 The park is 19,500 km² in size, and it is divided into 14 different ecozones, each of which is home to a different wild animal.
 It is one of the main attractions of South Africa and is considered to be the leading among South African National Parks (SANParks).
 As in all South African national parks, there is a daily conservation fee to visit and protect the park.
 The Hershey and Chase experiment was one of the leading suggestions that DNA was a genetic material.
 Hong Kong territory was named after the Island of Hong Kong, a place that many tourists consider to be the main object of their attention.
 A veritable line of buildings forming the line of the Hong Kong horizon, compared to a sparkling Diagonal, underlined by the water of Victoria Bay.
 To see the most picturesque spots of Hong Kong, one should leave the island and head to the coast of the Zhuhai peninsula, which is located opposite.
 The largest part of Hong Kong's urban development is closely concentrated on reclaimed land on the northern shore.
 This place, which British colonizers took for themselves, and if you're looking for evidence of the territory's colonial past, this is a good place to start.
 Sundarban is the largest belt of coastal Mangrove forests, stretching 80 km (50 miles) from the shore in Bangladesh and India.
 Sundarban was declared a UNESCO world heritage site, part of the forest within the Indian territory is called Sundarban National Park.
 These forests are not just Mangrove swamps, but also some of the last remaining great jungles that once covered the Ganges plain.
 Sundarban covers an area of 3,850 square kilometers, of which about one-third is covered by water or swamps.
 Since 1966, Sundarban has been a wildlife sanctuary, and, according to estimates, there are now about 400 Bengal Tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer on its territory.
 Buses depart from the inter-city bus station (across the river) throughout the day, though most, especially those heading east and to Jakarta, depart between 06:30 and 07:30.
 As inter-city buses are often overcrowded, it is advisable to purchase a ticket a few days in advance.
 The great majority of Hong Kong Island's urban development is densely packed on reclaimed land along the northern shore.
 The bus is a fast and convenient way to get to places like Paro (150 Ngultrum) and Punakha (200 Ngultrum).
 The bridge across the Oiapoque River represents a Van-Ta-Van bridge, it spans the Oiapoque River and connects the cities of Oiapoque in Brazil and Saint-George-de-l'Oiapoque in French Guiana.
 These two towers reach 83 meters in height, and the bridge itself is 378 meters in length and has two lanes, each 3.5 meters wide.
 The height of the substructure is 15 meters. Construction was completed in August 2011, it was not opened for traffic until March 2017.
 According to the plan, the bridge will fully enter into service in September 2017, when Brazilian customs points are expected to be completed.
 Guarani were the most significant indigenous group living in the region that is now occupied by Eastern Paraguay, they lived as semi-nomadic hunters who also practiced natural farming.
 The Chaco region served as home to different groups of local tribes, for example, for the Guaykiru and the Payaguas, they survived by hunting, gathering and fishing.
 In the sixteenth century, Paraguay, which had been called the great province of the East Indies, arose as a result of the clash between Spanish conquerors and the indigenous groups.
 The Spanish began a period of colonization that lasted three centuries.
 Since the foundation of Asuncion in 1537, Paraguay has mostly managed to preserve most of its self-identity and identity.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best teams, and also the best players in the world in a sport like polo.
 The largest tournament of the year takes place in December on the polo fields in Las Canjitas.
 Lesser tournaments and matches here are also available to watch at other times of the year.
 To find out news about the matches and where to buy tickets, go to the site of the Argentinean Polo Association.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound, which is equivalent to one British pound sterling.
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank on these Islands, which is located on Port Stanley opposite the FIC West store.
 As a rule, British pounds are accepted everywhere on the Islands, and Stanley also often accepts credit cards and U S . dollars.
 On remote Islands, credit cards may not be accepted, although British and American currency may be accepted.
 The currency of the Falkland Islands is almost impossible to exchange outside their borders, so exchange your money before you leave the Islands.
 Since Montevideo is located south of the equator, there is summer when in the northern hemisphere it is winter, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics. In the summer months, the air temperature above 30°C is common.
 Winter can be deceptively cold: temperatures rarely drop below freezing, but a combination of wind and humidity creates a feeling of colder weather than the thermometer indicates.
 Here there are no particularly wet or dry seasons: the amount of rainfall is approximately the same all year round.
 Although many animals in the park are used to seeing humans, nature is still wild, so do not feed or disturb the animals.
 The administration of the park warns, do not approach more than 100 yards to bears and wolves, and more than 25 yards to all other wild animals.
 No matter how docile they look, bison, elk, bears and practically all large animals can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors get injured because they don't respect the animals' personal space.
 Besides, remember that smells attract bears and other wild animals, so avoid preparing or wearing with you pungent food, and keep the camp clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa, located on the island of Upolu and has a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The Bay was the site of a notorious naval standoff in 1889 when seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Britain refused to leave the Bay.
 All the ships sank, except for one British cruiser, killing about 200 American and German sailors.
 During the Mau movement, a peaceful rally in the city led to the killing of the Supreme Chief, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 Here are many beaches, as Auckland is situated on the shores of two harbours. The most popular beaches are in three areas.
 Beaches in the North shore area (in the North Harbour region) are washed by the Pacific ocean and stretch from Long Bay in the North to Devonport in the South.
 Almost all of these beaches are sandy with safe swimming, and many of them are shaded by trees such as the Poihutukawa.
 In central Auckland, where Waitemata Harbour is home to the prestigious suburbs of Mishn-Bay and St Heliers, Tamaki-Drive beaches stretch out.
 These are sometimes crowded family beaches with good shopping along the shore.
 The most popular local beer is called Number One, it has a simple, pleasant and refreshing taste.
 There are many French wines that can be drunk, however, New Zealand and Australian wines can transport better.
 The local water is perfectly safe to drink, but if you're still worried, it's not hard to find bottled water.
 Australians do not understand the idea of flat white. A small black is an espresso, a cappuccino they serve with a high layer of whipped cream, not foam, and tea without milk.
 Hot chocolate meets Belgium standards. Although fruit juices are expensive, they are of excellent quality.
 On the Reef, round the year, a great number of trips are made, and injuries caused by any of these reasons on the Reef are rare.
 Follow the recommendations of the authorities, obey all signs and pay close attention to safety warnings.
 Cubomedusa is found near beaches and river mouths north of 1770 from October to April, and sometimes outside of that period.
 Sharks do exist, but rarely attack humans, most sharks are afraid of humans and swim away.
 The Nile crocodile does not lead an active life in the ocean, but their main habitat is estuaries north of rockhampton.
 Pre-booking allows the traveler not to worry about where to stay upon arrival at the destination.
 Travel agents often make deals with specific hotels, but you can book through a travel agent and other forms of accommodation, such as camping sites.
 Travel agents usually sell packages that include breakfast, transfer to and from the airport, or even combined packages that include the flight and the hotel.
 Besides, they can keep your reservation if you need time to think over the offer or to get other documents for your destination point, for example, a visa.
 Any changes or requests need to be first sent to the tour agency, not directly to the hotel.
 At some music festivals, the overwhelming majority of participants sleep right on the festival grounds, and most of them consider this to be a mandatory part of the program.
 If you want to be close to the stage, you need to arrive early to find a place to camp near the music.
 Remember, even if the music on the main stages may already be finished, there may be areas on the festival where the music will continue playing late into the night.
 At some festivals there are special camping zones for families with small children.
 If you cross the northern part of the Baltic Sea in winter, find out about the location of your cabin, as the passage through the ice can lead to a rather unpleasant noise, which can disturb the most sensitive people.
 Cruises to St Petersburg include tours of the city. Cruise passengers are exempt from visa requirements.
 Casinos usually make every effort to keep visitors inside as long as possible and to spend as much money as possible in the establishment.
 They usually offer special food, drinks and entertainment to keep guests in a good mood and not to leave the establishment.
 In some establishments, free alcohol is offered, but drunkenness tumbles the mind, and all good players know how important it is to remain sober.
 All who are going to travel through high-altitude areas or over mountain passes should consider the possibility of snow, ice or frost.
 On ice and snow, the road is low friction, and you can't drive a car the same way you would on a regular asphalt road.
 During a blizzard, enough snow can fall in a very short period of time to cause a vehicle to become stuck.
 Visibility may also be limited due to snow, sleet, condensation, or ice on the windshield of the transportation vehicle.
 On the other hand, weather conditions with snow and ice are normal in many countries, and road traffic continues almost without interruption throughout the year.
 Safari is probably the biggest tourist attraction in Africa and the main event for many travelers.
 The term safari in everyday usage means a land trip to see the spectacular wildlife of Africa, especially in the savannah.
 Some animals, such as elephants or giraffes, often approach cars, so that even with ordinary equipment you can get a good view.
 Lions, cheetahs, and leopards are sometimes cautious, and you'll see them better through binoculars.
 A safari, which is also called a bushwalking safari or a walking safari, consists of a hike lasting from several hours to several days.
 The Paralympic games will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events taking place in different locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will become the only city in Asia to host the summer Olympics twice.
 If you've booked flights and accommodation for 2020 before it was announced that the date had been postponed, you may find yourself in a difficult situation.
 The rules for cancelling orders may differ, but as of late March, most of the rules related to the Coronavirus do not apply to July 2020, when the Olympics were scheduled to take place.
 It is expected that most tickets for the events will cost between 2,500 and 130,000 yen, with a standard ticket price of around 7,000 yen.
 A wet towel helps it dry. Many hotels provide a rental iron and ironing board, even if they are absent from the room.
 If you don't have an iron or you're not in love with the idea of wearing ironed socks, you can try a Fan, if you have one.
 Do not expose the fabric to too high a temperature (which can cause shrinkage or in very rare cases, burn).
 There are different ways of cleaning water, some of them more effective against particular threats.
 In some places, it takes a minute to boil water, in others, it takes several minutes.
 Filters are effective in different ways, and in case of doubt, you should think about buying water in sealed bottles from a reputable company.
 Travellers may encounter animals that they have not seen in their own native lands.
 Pests can spoil food, cause irritation or, worse, cause allergic reactions, release toxins or transmit infection.
 Infectious diseases themselves or dangerous animals that can cause damage or lead to human death are generally not considered pests.
 Shopping duty-free is the opportunity to buy goods in certain points without taxes and duties.
 Travelers heading to countries with high taxation may sometimes save a significant sum, especially on such goods as alcohol and tobacco.
 The section between Point-Marion and Fayetteville has the most difficult driving conditions on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway, often passing through isolated, hilly, and wooded terrain.
 If you're not used to driving on rural roads, be on the lookout for steep slopes, narrow alleyways, and sharp turns.
 The established speed limits are markedly lower than on previous and subsequent sections, usually 35 to 40 mph, and strict enforcement of them is even more important than elsewhere.
 However, strangely, mobile phone service here is much better than on many other parts of the route, such as in Pennsylvania's Wilds.
 German confectionery is very good, and in Bavaria it is very abundant and varied, and resembles the confectionery of their Southern neighbour, Austria.
 Fruit cakes are common, and apple cakes are available year-round, with apples and pears appearing in the summer.
 In German baking, minced nuts, almonds, and other tree nuts are often used, and frequently popular cakes are combined with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you want a small, but filling, sweet, baked confection, try something that, depending on the region, is called Oladzh or Punchki with a filling.
 Carri is a dish based on herbs and spices in combination with meat or vegetables.
 Depending on the contents of the liquid, curry can be dry or wet.
 In the interior of Pakistan and northern India, carrot is used in yogurt. In Southern India and certain regions on the subcontinent's coast, coconut milk is commonly used.
 Indonesian cuisine, having 17,000 islands to choose from, is a general term applied to a huge variety of regional cuisines found throughout the country.
 But without specifics, the term is most often used to mean food from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 The Javanese cuisine, today widely spread throughout the archipelago, includes a variety of spicy dishes, with a preference for arachis, chili, sugar, especially Javanese coconut sugar, and various aromatic spices.
 Stremena are the supports for the rider's legs, hanging from both sides of the saddle.
 They provide the rider with better stability, but may cause problems with safety, as there is a possibility of the leg getting stuck.
 If a horse should throw a rider, but his leg is stuck in the stirrup, a running horse may drag him along.
 First, most of the riders wear boots for riding with a heel, having a smooth and rather thin sole.
 Besides, separate saddles, especially English ones, are fitted with precautionary dampers, by which the leather strap is thrown off the saddle if it is pulled back by a falling rider.
 The valley of Coquimbo is the main destination in Chile for Alpinism, and is known as Yosemite of South America, and has a large number of big Granite walls and cliffs.
 Up top, you can enjoy stunning mountain scenery, with rock climbers from all over the world constantly creating new routes in its enormous potential for alpinism.
 Mountain winter sports, including skiing and snowboarding, are popular sports that involve descending a snow-covered terrain on skis or a snowboard.
 Skiing is the main tourist destination for many skiers (they are sometimes called ski bums) who plan their holiday around skiing in a particular place.
 The idea of skiing is very old: rock paintings depicting skiers date back to 5000 BC.
 Skiing as a sport dates back at least to the seventeenth century, and in 1861, Norwegians opened the first recreational ski club in Australia.
 Ski touring is also called backcountry, ski touring, or hiking on skis.
 This is associated, but usually not included, with climbing to the summit and then descending down unprepared slopes, as skiing on the tundra requires more rigid skis and boots.
 Imagine that a ski route is a hiking route.
 With good conditions you can cover several times more distance than when walking, but such speed on skis you can develop only in extremely rare cases when you have no heavy rucksack and there is a well-marked trail.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but there are many independent states in it. In ordinary circumstances, travelling through many countries would mean having to apply for visas and going through passport control many times.
 Schengen zone in this sense functions like a single country.
 Being in this zone, you can usually cross the border without having to go through passport control again.
 Similarly, if you have a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for a visa in each of the Schengen countries separately, which will save you time and money, as well as avoiding paperwork.
 There is no universal definition of what produced goods are antiques, some tax authorities define goods that are over 100 years old as antiques.
 There are geographic varieties of this concept in which the age limit may be less than in Europe.
 Crafts can be defined as antiques, despite the fact that they are younger than similar goods of mass production.
 Reindeer herding is an important source of livelihood for the Saami people, and the surrounding culture is also important for many other professions.
 Although such a tradition, not all representatives of the Saami people engaged in mass breeding of reindeer, they lived fishing, hunting and other similar crafts, using reindeer mainly as a draft animal.
 Today, many Saami are employed in modern professions. Tourism is an important source of income in the Saami region of Lapland.
 Although the word Gypsy is widely used, especially among non-Roma, it is often considered offensive because of associations with negative stereotypes and misconceptions about the Romani people.
 If a country you are planning to visit has travel warnings, it may affect your medical insurance while you are there or your travel insurance.
 Perhaps you should also consult with other governments, apart from your own, but their recommendations are aimed at their own citizens.
 One example is that U S . citizens in the Middle East may face situations that Europeans or Arabs cannot.
 In information reports, only briefly described the political situation in one country.
 The views expressed are often superficial, vague and overly simplified in comparison to the more widely available, more detailed information.
 Adverse weather conditions are a general term for any dangerous weather event that is capable of causing some sort of damage, social disruption, or human casualties.
 Unfavorable weather conditions vary everywhere around the world, and they vary in different ways, depending on geography, the topography of the area, and the atmosphere.
 Strong winds, hail, heavy rains and forest fires are manifestations and effects of severe weather events, such as hurricanes, tornadoes, waterspouts and hurricanes.
 Regional and seasonal hazardous weather events include blizzards, snowstorms, ice and dust storms.
 Travellers are strongly recommended to take any risks associated with severe weather in their area into account, as they may affect any plans for their trip.
 All who plan to visit a country that may be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 A search on the Internet for the phrase, safety course in hostile environment, may yield the address of a local company.
 In course usually much more in detail all the topics touched on here are usually discussed with training on the practice.
 The course normally lasts from two to five days and includes playing out situations, a lot of first aid information and sometimes training with weapons.
 Books and magazines where survival in wild conditions are told, are often met, but publications about zones of military operations are a little.
 People planning to have sex change operations overseas should make sure they have valid documents for the return journey.
 Same goes for the military because instead of Army rankings being based on class they were now based on cailaber.
 The readiness of foreign governments to fulfill their obligations under these documents is very varied.
 Security at checkpoints also became much more stringent after the events of September 11, 2001.
 Transgender people preparing for an operation should not expect that they will be able to pass through scanners and have their privacy and dignity respected.
 A breaker is a wave that breaks, or sometimes breaks, or sometimes breaks, or something like that.
 The reverse flow concentrates in a few deeper areas where rapid current can form, going to greater depths, due to such subsurface topography.
 Most deaths occur as a result of fatigue when trying to swim back against the current, which may be impossible.
 Once you're out of the current, swimming back will be no harder than usual.
 Try to go somewhere where you won't be caught again, or, depending on your skills and whether or not you were spotted, you may want to wait for rescue.
 Shock upon return to the home country comes earlier, lasts longer, and can be more intense.
 Travelers who easily adapt to a new culture sometimes find it especially hard to readapt to their own culture.
 When you return home after living abroad, you're adapted to a new culture and have lost some of your home culture's habits.
 When you first went abroad, people likely treated you with patience and understanding, knowing that travelers need to adapt to a new country.
 For people, it may be unexpected that patience and understanding are necessary to show to travelers who have returned home.
 Sound and light show on the pyramid is one of the most interesting events in this locality for children.
 The pyramids can be seen in the dark, and you can also see them in silence before the show begins.
 Usually there is always a buzz of tourists and vendors. The history of sound and light is like a book with stories.
 Sphinx serves as a backdrop and narrator of a long story.
 Scenes show on pyramids, and different pyramids are lit.
 Several countries claim the open in 1819 South Shetland Islands, which are home to more bases than any other country.
 The archipelago is located 120 kilometers from the peninsula, the largest island of which bears the name King George with the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas.
 Others include Livingstone Island and Deseret, where a submerged caldera of an active volcano represents a spectacular natural harbor.
 El Salvador is an area south of the Antarctic peninsula, washed by the sea of Belingshausen.
 The mountains of this peninsula here merge with the plateau, and then rise again to form the 360-kilometre-long Elesuert system, divided by the Minneapolis glacier into two parts.
 In the northern part, namely on the ridge of Sentinel, are the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson massif, whose highest peak reaches 4892 m and is called Vinson peak.
 In remote places outside of mobile phone coverage, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 As a rule, a satellite phone is not a substitute for a mobile phone, since you need to be in a direct line of sight with the satellite to make a call.
 Service is often used in shipping, including pleasure and fast-moving vessels, where there is a need for remote data and voice communication.
 As a rule, you will be able to get additional information about connecting this service by contacting your local telephone service operator.
 A variant becoming increasingly popular for those planning to take an academic year, is to travel and study.
 This is especially popular among high school graduates, allowing them to take a year off before entering the University, without putting their education at risk.
 In many cases, attending a course abroad during an academic break can actually increase your chances of getting into a top school at home.
 As a rule, when entering such educational programs, a fee for training is charged.
 Finland is a great place for boating tourism, with thousands of Islands in the thousands of lakes and archipelagos.
 Exploring archipelagos or visiting lakes, you can quite manage without a yacht.
 Although the coastal archipelagos and the largest lakes can accommodate any yacht, smaller boats or even a kayak leave quite different impressions.
 Boating is a national form of recreation in Finland, in particular, one boat is for seven or eight people.
 Singapore is generally an extremely safe place to be and very easy to navigate, and you can buy almost anything after arriving.
 Most individual Baltic cruises include an extended stop in the Russian city of St Petersburg.
 This means that you can spend several full days in this historic city and then return to the ship for the night.
 If you go ashore only in order of excursion on a ship, you do not need a separate visa (since 2009).
 In some cruise brochures, Berlin, Germany is represented. As you can see on the map above, Berlin is far inland and a visit to the city is not included in the cruise price.
 Traveling by airplane can be scary for a person of any age and social status, especially if it's their first flight in life or if they've had a traumatic event in the past.
 It's nothing to be ashamed of, it's nothing different from personal dislike and fear of other things that many people have.
 Understanding how a plane works and what happens during flight can help overcome the fear that arises from not knowing or being unable to control the process.
 Delivery services are well paid for fast delivery. Often, the speed of delivery of commercial documents, goods or spare parts for urgent repair is very important.
 Some routes are served by larger companies, but for other routes and smaller companies, this was a problem.
 If they sent anything as air cargo, then on some routes, unloading and customs could take several days.
 The only way to deal with it is to send it as registered baggage, and the airline's regulations do not allow baggage to be sent without a passenger, so you need to be involved.
 The most obvious way to fly first or business class is to pay for the privilege (or, better still, to get your company to pay for you).
 In fact, it's quite expensive, in rough approximation, you'll pay four times more for business and eleven times more for first class.
 As a rule, it's not even worth looking for business class or first class deals for direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know well that there is a certain core group of passengers who are willing to pay a premium to get somewhere quickly and comfortably, so they charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau, and the local language is Romanian, but Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a Multi-National Republic that became a victim of ethnic conflict.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Transnistrian Republic, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of political negotiations, economic ties between these two parts of Moldova were restored.
 The main religion in Moldova is Orthodox Christianity.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million, the largest port after Istanbul, and a major transportation hub.
 Once the ancient city of Smyrna, today a modern, developed and bustling trade center, located along a huge Bay and surrounded by mountains.
 Wide boulevards, buildings with glass facades, modern shopping centers intermingle with traditional red-tiled roofs, old markets, and churches, though the city has more of a Mediterranean Europe atmosphere than traditional Turkey.
 From the village of Halldorsvik, a view opens on the nearby Estuary Island, also home to an unusual eight-sided church.
 On the church cemetery over some graves there are interesting mosaic sculptures of pigeons.
 It's worth spending half an hour and walking through the unusual village.
 Comparatively not far to the north, situated is the romantic and charming town of Sintra, celebrated by Lord Byron and known to the world ever since.
 The Scotturb bus number 403 makes regular trips to Sintra and makes a stop at the Cape of rock.
 North of the city, visit also the great temple of Fatima, the place of world-famous apparitions of the Virgin Mary.
 Please remember that you are, in principle, on a place of brotherly burial, and also a place that is inexpressibly important to a large percentage of the earth's population.
 There are still many men and women alive who survived their time here, but there are even more people whose close relatives were killed here or worked to death, whether they were Jews or people of other nationalities.
 Please treat this place with all the dignity, seriousness and respect it deserves, please do not joke about the holocaust and Nazis.
 Do not deface this place by writing or scratching graffiti on objects around.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish, with about half the population preferring to speak Catalan, most understanding it, and almost all knowing Spanish.
 However, most signs are only in Catalan, since it is the first official language, by law.
 Spanish is also widely used in public transport and other public places.
 Normal announcements in the Metro are only made in Catalan, but unplanned disruptions are announced by an automated system in a variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are known to be egoistic, rude and arrogant.
 Perhaps, it's just a false stereotype, but the best way to succeed in Paris is to behave in the best way as a well-educated person.
 The unfriendly appearance of the Parisians vanishes at once, if you show a little elementary politeness.
 Plitvice Lakes National Park is heavily forested, mainly with beech, elm and pine, and represents a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 Thanks to a variety of microclimates, different soils and altitude ranges, it represents a particularly wide variety of plant communities.
 The locality abounds with a great variety of different kinds of animals and birds.
 Here you can meet rare representatives of fauna, for example, the European Brown bear, wolf, Eagle, Owl, Fox, Lynx, and many other common species of animals.
 When visiting monasteries, women should be dressed in skirts below the knee and with their shoulders covered.
 In most monasteries, they give the robe to women who come unprepared, but if you take your own, especially if it's a bright color, the monk or nun will smile at you.
 similarly, men should wear trousers that cover the knees.
 They too can be taken at the entrance, however, this clothing is not washed after each use, so you may not be comfortable in these skirts.
 Majorcan cuisine, like that of similar regions of the Mediterranean, is based on vegetables, bread and meat, with olive oil used everywhere.
 A simple and popular lunchtime dish, especially in the summer, is Pa-Am-Oli: bread with olive oil, tomatoes, and any available toppings, such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 All nouns, as well as Sie, meaning you, always write with a capital letter even in the middle of a sentence.
 It's important to distinguish between gambling and additions.
 This also makes reading easier, while writing is somewhat made more difficult by the need to figure out whether a verb or adjective is in the substantivized form.
 The pronunciation in Italian is relatively simple, as most of the words are pronounced exactly as they are spelled.
 It should be especially careful with the letters c and g, since their pronunciation changes depending on the following vowel.
 Similarly, by having a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for visas to each of the Schengen member countries separately, hence saving time, money and paperwork.
 In Persian, the grammar is relatively easy and mostly regular.
 Therefore, reading this Persian grammar book will help you to learn many new things and to better understand the expressions.
 Obviously, if you speak a Romance language, it will be easier to learn Portuguese.
 However, people who know a little Spanish may hastily conclude that Portuguese is quite similar and can be learned without teaching it separately.
 Ancient Observatories, as a rule, today are considered outdated and serve as museums or educational institutions.
 Since light pollution was not a problem during their heyday, they are usually located in cities or on campuses, which are easier to get to than those built in our time.
 Most modern research telescopes are huge, remote, and atmospherically benign.
 The contemplation of the cherry blossom, called Hanami, has been a part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 This idea came from China, where the favorite flower was a plum color.
 In Japan, the first celebrations of the Sakura were held by the Emperor for himself and other members of the aristocracy at the Imperial court.
 Plants look their best in their natural habitat, so don't be tempted to take even one specimen.
 When visiting an officially organised garden, the collection of samples will also lead to you being thrown out without any conversation.
 Singapore is a very safe place to navigate, and practically everything can be bought after arrival.
 But, once you're in the deep tropics, just a few degrees north of the equator, you'll have to deal with both heat (constantly) and strong sun (when it's clear).
 There are also several buses going north to Hebron, the legendary burial place of the Biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac and Jacob, and their wives.
 Make sure the bus you're getting on is going to Hebron, not just to the nearby Jewish settlement Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a good theme for a holiday.
 For example, visiting castles in the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, a cruise on the Danube, or a trip on the Erie Canal.
 They also identify routes for popular walking and bicycling routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays in Christianity, and it is celebrated as the day of Jesus' birth.
 Many traditions associated with this holiday were also adopted by non-Christians in Christian countries and by non-Christians worldwide.
 There is a tradition of spending Easter night, not going to bed, in some open place to see the sunrise.
 Of course, this tradition has a Christian theological explanation, but it may well be a pre-Christian ritual of spring and fertility.
 More traditional churches often hold Easter services on Saturday evening during Easter weekend, with the congregation usually beginning the Easter Vigil at midnight.
 All animals that originally arrived on these Islands, came here by swimming, flew or were washed ashore.
 Because of the great distance from the mainland, mammals could not reach there, making the giant tortoise the main herbivore on the Galapagos Islands.
 Since the arrival of humans to the Galapagos Islands, many mammals, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats, and dogs, have been brought.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic in the winter, you'll learn what a polar night is, when the sun doesn't rise above the horizon.
 This represents a good opportunity to see the northern lights, because the sky will be more or less dark all day.
 As these areas are sparsely populated and, as a result, light pollution is often not a problem, you'll also be able to enjoy the stars.
 Japanese culture of work is Hierarchical and more formal than what Westerners are used to.
 Costumes are standard business attire, and colleagues address each other by their first name or by their title.
 Extremely important is harmony at the workplace, and the results of group work are valued above individual achievements.
 Usually, workers must get the permission of the chief before making any decisions and are obliged to obey the chief's orders unquestioningly.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.3041317259391422, 'precisions': [0.6193781458028901, 0.3647138503217067, 0.23903237219175658, 0.16064814814814815], 'brevity_penalty': 0.9965557097949863, 'length_ratio': 0.9965616277658671, 'translation_length': 24636, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 57.75914940956469, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}